Utah statutes.
26-15a-105.   Exemptions to food service establishment requirements.
(1)  The following are not subject to the provisions of Section 26-15a-104:
(a)  special events sponsored by municipal or nonprofit civic organizations,
including food booths at school sporting events and little league athletic
events and church functions;
(b)  temporary event food services approved by a local health department;
(c)  vendors and other food service establishments that serve only
commercially prepackaged foods and beverages as defined by the department by
rule;
(d)  private homes not used as a commercial food service establishment;
(e)  health care facilities licensed under Chapter 21, Health Care Facility
Licensing and Inspection Act;
(f)  bed and breakfast establishments at which the only meal served is a
continental breakfast as defined by the department by rule;
(g)  residential child care providers;
(h)  child care providers and programs licensed under Chapter 39, Utah Child
Care Licensing Act;
(i)  back country food service establishments; and
(j)  a lowest risk or permitted food establishment category determined by a
risk assessment evaluation established by the department by administrative
rule adopted in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act.
(2)  Nothing in this section may be construed as exempting a food service
establishment described in Subsection (1) from any other applicable food
safety laws of this state.
